Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-217
Testing centers; equipment; employees; salaries; regulations.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, through the Director of the Agricultural Experimental Station, shall have control and supervision of such testing centers and shall appoint such employees and purchase such equipment as shall appear to it to be necessary to obtain the best results. The board shall fix the salaries and compensation of employees, and establish such rules and regulations as it may, from time to time, deem necessary.

Laws 1943, c. 5, § 2, p. 60;

R.S.1943, § 85-217.